Washington statutes.
RCW 18.06.110

Application of Uniform Disciplinary Act.

The Uniform Disciplinary Act, chapter 18.130 RCW, governs uncertified practice, the issuance and denial of licenses, and the disciplining of license holders under this chapter. The secretary shall be the disciplining authority under this chapter.

[ 1995 c 323 s 9; 1991 c 3 s 11; 1987 c 150 s 9; 1985 c 326 s 11.]

NOTES:

Severability—1987 c 150: See RCW 18.122.901.